apertium-ur-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="खर्च__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="धु/आँ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ध/ी__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियाँ</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऐ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गम__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मचिय/ा__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाँ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="नति__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>याँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="थ/ू__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ू</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुओं</l>
          <r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ध/ा__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>े<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>ों<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="इ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हनु__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="माँ__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दवा/अ__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="कुआँ"><i>कु</i><par n="धु/आँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="डिबिया"><i>डिबिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="फतिंगा"><i>फतिंग</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="भवांबुधि"><i>भवांबुधि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बिंदु"><i>बिंदु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="संशुद्धि"><i>संशुद्धि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तंबू"><i>तंब</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हिसाबबही"><i>हिसाबबह</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अँटिया"><i>अँटिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पादप्रहार"><i>पादप्रहार</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="माँ"><i>माँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अधेनु"><i>अधेनु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="फाटक"><i>फाटक</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिपूर्ति"><i>प्रतिपूर्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चालीसा"><i>चालीस</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बुलंदआवाजाअ"><i>बुलंदआवाजा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वन्यवृत्ति"><i>वन्यवृत्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="काजू"><i>काज</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="परीक्षाअ"><i>परीक्षा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कब्रिस्तान"><i>कब्रिस्तान</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्वाचकसूची"><i>निर्वाचकसूच</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नयनपथ"><i>नयनपथ</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मजहब"><i>मजहब</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शुक्ति"><i>शुक्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्ज"><i>कर्ज</i><par n="खर्च__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुठिया"><i>मुठिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तराजू"><i>तराज</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ठोखाअ"><i>ठोखा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="महाकवि"><i>महाकवि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="षडृतु"><i>षडृतु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शोधनी"><i>शोधन</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कदम"><i>कदम</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="धब्बा"><i>धब्ब</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ओषधि"><i>ओषधि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बिच्छू"><i>बिच्छ</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सानुकूल्य"><i>सानुकूल्य</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलवाँ"><i>ढलवाँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खरीदार"><i>खरीदार</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुझिया"><i>गुझिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="फावडी"><i>फावड</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="साजिशीअ"><i>साजिशी</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ढलुआँ"><i>ढलुआँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शक्यार्थ"><i>शक्यार्थ</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="त्रिमूर्ति"><i>त्रिमूर्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋतु"><i>ऋतु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मजाक"><i>मजाक</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हिसाबिया"><i>हिसाबिय</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="स्याही"><i>स्याह</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="असम्मति"><i>असम्मति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="डलिया"><i>डलिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="उल्लू"><i>उल्ल</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जूँआँ"><i>जूँ</i><par n="धु/आँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रोमहर्षण"><i>रोमहर्षण</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अम्माँ"><i>अम्माँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वस्ति"><i>स्वस्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वातायनी"><i>वातायन</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कीडा"><i>कीड</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उक्ति"><i>उक्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शल"><i>शल</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बुडिया"><i>बुडिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जम्मू"><i>जम्म</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रज्जु"><i>रज्जु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="यूँआँ"><i>यूँ</i><par n="धु/आँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खयाल"><i>खयाल</i><par n="गम__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लिच्छवि"><i>लिच्छवि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बोरिया"><i>बोरिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="झंडी"><i>झंड</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अपमृत्यु"><i>अपमृत्यु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कोटि"><i>कोटि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ढाँचा"><i>ढाँच</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मनोहर"><i>मनोहर</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दवाअ"><i>दवा</i><par n="दवा/अ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खर्च"><i>खर्च</i><par n="खर्च__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="धुआँ"><i>धु</i><par n="धु/आँ__n_m"/></e>
